Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 5401, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5401. A. There is hereby re-created the Oklahoma
Strategic Military Planning Commission.
B. The Oklahoma Strategic Military Planning Commission shall
consist of nine (9) members as follows:
1. Five persons to be appointed by the Governor, each of whom
shall represent, respectively, the interests of communities that
would be affected by realignment or closure of the following
military installations:
Req. No. 16079 Page 1

a. Altus Air Force Base,
b. Vance Air Force Base,
c. Fort Sill,
d. the Army Ammunition Plant located near McAlester, and
e. Tinker Air Force Base;
2. One person to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives from the membership of the House and one person to
be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate from the
membership of the Senate. The members appointed pursuant to this
paragraph shall be ex officio and nonvoting members of the
Commission; and
3. The Secretary of Veterans Affairs, or successor member of
the Governor's Executive Cabinet who has responsibility for Veterans
Affairs, and the Adjutant General of the Oklahoma Army and Air
National Guard. The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph
shall be ex officio and nonvoting members of the Commission.
C. The members of the Commission shall serve at the pleasure of
the appointing authority. The members of the Commission shall
select from among their membership a chair and vice-chair. The
chair and vice-chair shall serve for a period of one (1) year and
may succeed themselves in office.
D. The Commission shall be subject to the provisions of the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act.

Req. No. 16079 Page 2

E. The Commission shall be authorized to meet at such times as
may be required in order to fulfill the duties and responsibilities
imposed upon it by law.
F. The provisions of this section shall cease to have the force
and effect of law and the Commission shall be dissolved by operation
of law on December 31, 2025 2030.
G. The members of the Commission shall not be deemed to be
officers or to hold public office for purposes of Section 6 of Title
51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16079 SW 02/03/26









Req. No. 16079 Page 3